Washington statutes.
RCW 43.250.010

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to enable eligible governmental entities, including community and technical college districts, the state board for community and technical colleges as established in chapter 28B.50 RCW, public four-year institutions of higher education, qualifying federally recognized tribes or federally recognized political subdivisions thereof, and other governmental entities to participate with the state in providing maximum opportunities for the investment of surplus public funds consistent with the safety and protection of such funds. The legislature finds and declares that the public interest is found in providing maximum prudent investment of surplus funds, thereby reducing the need for additional taxation. The legislature also recognizes that not all eligible governmental entities are able to maximize the return on their temporary surplus funds. The legislature therefore provides in this chapter a mechanism whereby eligible governmental entities may, at their option, utilize the resources of the state treasurer's office to maximize the potential of surplus funds while ensuring the safety of those funds.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 10 s 1; 2001 c 31 s 1; 1996 c 268 s 1; 1986 c 294 s 1.]